Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1555
Department; encourage effective local littering laws.

The department shall work toward establishing effective local ordinances and resolutions relating to littering laws.

Laws 1979, LB 120, § 22.
October 30, 2015